prince/dictionaries/he-IL.dic
אהבנו/M
אהדן/N
אוששנו/M
אחלך/N
איישך/N
אכפנו/M
אמרך/N
אסלמנו/M
אפננם/N
אפפנו/M
ארותן/N
אשרך/M
באשך/N
בדקנו/M
בושך/N
בזזה/M
ביילכן/N
ביישה/M
בלבלך/N
בלסכן/N
בראה/M
ברברם/N
גאותן/N
גדעה/M
גדפן/N
גוועך/N
גחנך/N
גייסנו/M
גמגמכן/N
געותי/N
גפרן/N
דאבכם/N
דבררנו/M
דגדגכם/N
דהרך/N
דולן/N
דחקנו/M
דלותן/M
דללכן/N
דסקסך/N
דקרנו/M
דשדשן/N
האדים/M
האהיבה/M
האטכם/N
האיץ/M
האמין/M
האנישן/N
האפילה/M
האריך/M
האשימה/M
הבהיל/M
הבהירה/M
הבזיקכם/N
הבטיח/M
הביט/M
הביס/M
הבכיר/M
הבליגם/N
הבליטה/M
הבעירה/M
הבקיעה/M
הבריז/M
הבריקה/M
הגביה/M
הגביר/M
הגדיר/M
הגדישן/N
הגחיך/M
הגיח/M
הגיחך/N
הגיש/M
הגמיש/M
הגניבכם/N
הגעילה/M
הגשים/M
הדאיגה/M
הדבירה/M
הדגירה/M
הדהדן/N
הדהימה/M
הדחיקה/M
הדיר/M
הדליק/M
הדפיס/M
ההדיר/M
הובילה/M
הודותו/N
הודיעה/M
הוחיל/M
הוחילם/N
הוליך/M
הועיד/M
הוציא/M
הוקיר/M
הוריק/M
הושיבה/M
הושיעה/M
הזדהמן/N
הזדמננו/N
הזדקנכם/N
הזהיר/M
הזותו/N
הזיזה/M
הזיע/M
הזיקך/N
הזליף/M
הזניח/M
הזעים/M
הזקין/M
הזרימה/M
הזריקה/M
החדירה/M
החווירם/N
החזיר/M
החטיף/M
החישה/M
החליא/M
החליטכן/N
החלים/M
החליקה/M
החמיץ/M
החניפנו/N
החניק/M
החריב/M
החרים/M
החריש/M
החשותן/N
החשיך/M
הטביל/M
הטיב/M
הטילה/M
הטליא/M
הטמיע/M
הטעין/M
הטריחה/M
הטריפן/N
היאורכם/N
היאטמנו/N
היאמדכן/N
היאספה/N
היארגכם/N
היבגדנו/N
היבזזכן/N
היבלמך/N
היבעלכן/N
היבראה/N
היגוזכם/N
היגזרנו/N
היגמרך/N
היגרבן/N
היגררכם/N
הידהמנו/N
הידחקכם/N
הידלקכם/N
הידרככן/N
היווכחה/N
היווצרם/N
היזהרך/N
היזמרנו/N
היזרעכן/N
היחבשה/N
היחופכם/N
היחלבם/N
היחמדך/N
היחנקן/N
היחצבכם/N
היחרבנו/N
היחרשכן/N
היחשקה/N
היטבלם/N
היטמאה/N
היטעננו/N
היטשטשם/N
היכזבך/N
היכלמן/N
היכספכם/N
היכרכנו/N
הילאותך/N
הילחמכן/N
הילעסה/N
הימדדם/N
הימזגך/N
הימחצכן/N
הימלכה/N
הימסקם/N
הימרחכם/N
הימשלנו/N
הינגסכן/N
הינזקה/N
הינטעם/N
הינצלכם/N
הינקענו/N
הינתככן/N
היסדקך/N
היסחטן/N
היסלחכם/N
היספחנו/N
היסרקכן/N
היעורך/N
היעכרן/N
היענשכם/N
היעקדנו/N
היערמכן/N
היעתרה/N
היפוצם/N
היפנותנו/N
היפצעכן/N
היפרמה/N
היפרקם/N
היצבעך/N
היצלותכן/N
היצפרן/N
היקבעכם/N
היקהלנו/N
היקלותך/N
היקנסכן/N
היקרעה/N
הירגעם/N
הירטטך/N
הירמסן/N
הירקבה/N
הירתמם/N
הישאפך/N
הישברכן/N
הישחקה/N
הישיר/M
הישכחן/N
הישלמכם/N
הישמטנו/N
הישפטם/N
הישרכך/N
היתבען/N
היתמכן/N
היתפשנו/N
הכאיבם/N
הכביר/M
הכחיד/M
הכחישה/M
הכירה/M
הכליאכם/N
הכליב/M
הכלים/M
הכניע/M
הכעיס/M
הכפיף/M
הכריז/M
הכריעה/M
הכשילה/M
הכתיבה/M
הכתירה/M
הלבינה/M
הלהיבה/M
הלחים/M
הלחיץ/M
הלעיג/M
הלעיזכם/N
הלשין/M
המותך/N
המחישה/M
המיר/M
המיתם/M
המליט/M
הממכן/N
המסנו/M
המציא/M
המרידה/M
המשיכה/M
המתינם/N
המתיק/M
הנהיג/M
הנחית/M
הניא/M
הניח/M
הניע/M
הניק/M
הנעים/M
הנעימנו/N
הנפישה/M
הנשים/M
הסבנו/M
הסדירה/M
הסיח/M
הסיעה/M
הסיקן/N
הסית/M
הסכית/M
הסמיכה/M
הסמיקך/N
הסעירה/M
הספידה/M
הסריטה/M
הסתגרם/N
הסתכנכן/N
הסתעפכן/N
העבידה/M
העדיפה/M
העזכם/N
העיד/M
העיר/M
העליבה/M
העמיד/M
העמיקה/M
הענישה/M
העציב/M
העריב/M
הערימה/M
העשיר/M
העתיר/M
העתירנו/N
הפגיש/M
הפחית/M
הפיח/M
הפיץ/M
הפליא/M
הפליל/M
הפנותי/N
הפנים/M
הפסיקה/M
הפעימה/M
הפקיד/M
הפקיר/M
הפריז/M
הפריטה/M
הפריע/M
הפשיט/M
הפשיר/M
הצביע/M
הצהיב/M
הצהיבך/N
הצחיקה/M
הצטללך/N
הצטעצעם/N
הציגה/M
הציעה/M
הציק/M
הצליבה/M
הצמיד/M
הצמית/M
הצניחכן/N
הצניעה/M
הצפין/M
הצריח/M
הקדיח/M
הקהיל/M
הקטיר/M
הקיז/M
הקיף/M
הקישה/M
הקליטה/M
הקניטנו/N
הקסים/M
הקפיץ/M
הקצין/M
הקציפה/M
הקריבה/M
הקרין/M
הקשיח/M
הרגה/M
הרגילה/M
הרגישה/M
הרהיב/M
הרוותי/N
הרחיב/M
הרטיב/M
הריח/M
הרכיב/M
הרעיבה/M
הרעיש/M
הרקיעכם/N
הרשימה/M
השאילה/M
השביר/M
השחיל/M
השיא/M
השיטה/M
השית/M
השכימה/M
השליכה/M
השמיע/M
השעותי/N
השעין/M
השקיעה/M
השתובבם/N
השתטחכן/N
השתין/M
השתלהבן/N
השתעממם/N
השתרבבכם/N
התאבקן/N
התאיינכם/N
התאפסך/N
התבארם/N
התבטאכם/N
התבקשך/N
התגודדן/N
התגמדכם/N
התדפקם/N
התחבאם/N
התחיל/M
התחכככן/N
התחנפם/N
התחרמננו/N
התיידדכם/N
התייעדן/N
התישה/M
התכבדכם/N
התכסחן/N
התלהמכם/N
התלקחם/N
התמחזרכם/N
התמסרכם/N
התמתחך/N
התנהלכן/N
התנחמדכם/N
התנצחך/N
התסיסה/M
התעברן/N
התעכלם/N
התעניינן/N
התערבכם/N
התפוקקכן/N
התפלחכם/N
התפצחך/N
התפרשך/N
התקהלן/N
התקיף/M
התקנאכם/N
התקרשך/N
התרווחם/N
התרחשכם/N
התרפאך/N
ווסתם/M
וותרם/N
זעקכם/N
חבשנו/M
חוקקך/N
חמדך/N
חקקך/N
חתרם/N
טמטמנו/M
טענך/N
יגען/N
ייבבכם/N
ייבשה/M
יידעו/M
ייחסה/M
יילדו/M
ייללן/N
ייסרנו/M
ייצאנו/M
ייצגנו/M
יירטה/M
יישמה/M
יישרו/M
ינקך/N
כופפם/N
כפתם/M
כפתרן/N
כרתנו/M
לדתי/N
מאסן/N
מחצה/M
מכנם/N
מפותם/N
מרטה/M
נבעם/N
נוונך/N
נטרלנו/M
נטרן/N
נצצן/N
סבננו/N
סובבנו/M
סכמנו/M
סכסככן/N
סערכן/N
עגננו/N
עודדנו/M
עלבם/N
עקדם/N
עקפנו/M
פגלם/N
פגשנו/M
פחתך/N
פלרטטם/N
פענחנו/M
פצלנו/N
פרמטכם/N
צדדכם/N
צייצכן/N
צקצקכן/N
צרכה/M
קומן/N
קיימנו/M
קמרך/N
קרמכם/N
רבותכם/N
רדפנו/M
רוקנן/N
רמסנו/M
רנננו/N
רתכך/N
שגשגך/N
שזרה/M
שחדכם/N
שימם/M
שלהבה/M
שלשכם/N
שמרה/M
שעטם/N
שעתקה/M
שרבטה/M
שרדם/N
תאגדך/N
תגברה/M
תחחה/N
תחקרה/M
תססכן/N
תעבה/M
תפעלנו/M
תקשרן/N
תרבתם/M
